North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159B. Joint Municipal Electric Power and Energy Act.
Article 2. Joint Agencies; Municipalities.
§ 159B-33.
Eminent domain.

Municipalities participating in a joint project and joint agencies shall possess the power of eminent domain to the extent and in the same manner and under the same laws as municipalities pursuant to Chapter 40A of the General Statutes of North Carolina; provided, however, that a municipality or joint agency exercising the power of eminent domain for a purpose authorized by this Chapter shall have no power to condemn an existing facility used for the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy; provided, further, that the North Carolina Utilities Commission shall have the power and authority to order that the lines and rights-of-way of any public utility or electric membership corporation, municipalities participating in a joint project or any joint agency may be crossed by any municipalities participating in a joint project or any joint agency or that the lines of any municipalities participating in a joint project or any joint agency may be crossed by any public utility or electric membership corporation pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 62-39

; provided, further, when any municipalities participating in a joint project, or any joint agency, proposes to condemn the lands or rights-of-way of any public utility, electric membership corporation, municipalities participating in a joint project or any joint agency, or any public utility or electric membership corporation proposes to condemn the lands or rights-of-way of any municipalities participating in a joint project or any joint agency, not then used for the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy but held for future use or development, the party desiring to condemn shall file a petition with the North Carolina Utilities Commission requesting authority to condemn such lands or rights-of-way. Upon such petition, the North Carolina Utilities Commission shall have the power and authority, after notice and hearing, to order that such lands or rights-of-way, or parts thereof, may be condemned, and its order shall be final, subject to appeal as provided in this section. In all such cases in which the Commission permits condemnation and when the parties affected cannot agree upon the damages to be paid for the lands or rights-of-way to be condemned, it shall be the duty of the Commission to fix the damages, if any, to be paid in such amounts as may be just and equitable. Any party shall have the right of appeal from any final order or decision or determination of the North Carolina Utilities Commission as to matters of crossings and condemnation of property held for future use or development pursuant to the provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1981, c. 919, s. 27.

§ 159B-34.
Liability and defense.

No commissioner or officer of any joint agency or municipality, or member of an executive committee created pursuant to

G.S. 159B-10

, or person or persons acting in their behalf, while acting within the scope of their authority, shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his carrying out any of the powers expressly or impliedly given in this Chapter.

The governing board of a joint agency may provide for the defense of a criminal or civil proceeding brought against any current or former commissioner, member of an executive committee, officer, agent or employee either in his official or individual capacity, or both, on account of any act done or omission made in the scope and course of his employment or duty as a commissioner, member of an executive committee, officer, agent, or employee of the joint agency. The defense may be provided by the agency by its own counsel, by employing other counsel or by purchasing insurance which requires that the insurer provide the defense.

The governing board may appropriate funds for the purpose of paying all or part of a claim made or any civil judgment entered against any of its current or former commissioners, members of executive committees, officers, agents or employees, when such claim is made or such judgment is rendered as damages on account of any act done or omission made in the scope and course of his current or former employment or duty as a commissioner, member of an executive committee, officer, agent or employee; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall authorize any joint agency to appropriate funds for the purpose of paying any claim made or civil judgment entered against any current or former commissioners, members of executive committees, officers, agents or employees if the board of commissioners finds that commissioner, member of an executive committee, officer, agent or employee acted or failed to act because of actual fraud, corruption or actual malice on his part. Any joint agency may purchase insurance coverage for payment of claims or judgments pursuant to this section.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1985, c. 225, s. 1; 1995, c. 412, s. 20.

§ 159B-35.
Additional method.

The foregoing sections of this Chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative and complete method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that insofar as the provisions of this Chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other general, special or local law, the provisions of this Chapter shall be controlling. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to authorize the issuance of bonds for the purpose of financing facilities to be owned exclusively by any private corporation.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1977, c. 385, s. 13.

§ 159B-36.

Recodified as

G.S. 159B-52

by Session Laws 1983, c. 609, s. 8.

§ 159B-37.
Actions relating to bonds or to security for bonds.

Notwithstanding the general provisions concerning venue contained in Chapter 1, Subchapter IV, Article 7, or elsewhere in the General Statutes, any action or proceeding by or against a municipality or a joint agency that concerns or relates to (a) any bonds issued pursuant to this Chapter, (b) any contract or document the revenues from which secure in whole or in part the payment of said bonds or (c) any other security or source for payment of said bonds must be tried in the Superior Court of Wake County.

History.

1985, c. 414, s. 1.

§ 159B-38.
Confidentiality of contract discussions.

Discussions of a proposed or existing contract to which a joint agency may be or is a party for the construction, ownership, or operation of works, plants, and facilities for or incident to the generation, transmission, or use of electric power and energy or the purchase, sale, exchange, interchange, wheeling, pooling, transmission, or use of electric power and energy shall be confidential and information relating to such discussions shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes; provided that any contract entered into by or on behalf of a joint agency as defined by

G.S. 159B-3

shall be a public record unless otherwise exempted by law.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 570, s. 11.

§ 159B-39.
Permitted uses of revenue from electric power rates.

A municipality as authorized in this Chapter shall use revenue derived from rates for electric service to (i) pay the direct and indirect costs of operating the electric system and (ii) transfer to other funds of the municipality a sum that reflects a rate of return on the investment in the electric system to the extent allowed in subsection (c) of this section. Any remaining revenue shall be used to produce lower rates on electric service within the area served by the municipal electric system and to make additional debt service payments on bonds or other indebtedness incurred by the municipality to finance improvements to the electric system. A municipality shall not otherwise transfer revenue from an electric utility fund to any other fund of the municipality for any other purpose not explicitly authorized by law.

The direct and indirect costs of operating the electric system include all of the following:

Debt service payments on indebtedness incurred for the electric system or secured by revenues of the electric system.

Capital improvements or equipment for the electric system.

Payments for the cost of power purchased under contractual arrangements.

Debt service, maintenance, renewal, and replacement or other reserves required by legal documents entered into by the municipality in connection with the issuance of bonds or other indebtedness for the electric system.

Reserves deemed necessary by the governing body of the municipality to assure that funds are available to maintain the financial and operational integrity of the electric system.

Maintaining a rate stabilization fund to minimize the impact of periodic rate changes that would otherwise be required to reflect changes in costs of operations and demand for electric service.

Making payments in lieu of taxes to other governmental units to reflect property taxes that would have been collected by the other governmental unit if the municipality were not the owner of the electric system.

Making transfers to the general fund or other funds of the municipality to reimburse the general fund or other funds for costs paid from the fund that are reasonably allocable to the electric system.

The total amount transferred to other funds of the municipality authorized as a rate of return on the investment of the municipality in the electric system shall be calculated using amounts reported in the municipality’s audited financial statements for the preceding fiscal year. The amount transferred may be less than the following, but in no event may the amount transferred exceed the greater of the following:

Three percent (3%) of the gross capital assets of the electric system at the end of the preceding fiscal year.

Five percent (5%) of the gross annual revenues of the electric system for the preceding fiscal year.

The restrictions in this section shall not apply to any action required to be taken for a municipality by the Local Government Commission in accordance with

G.S. 159-181(c)

.

This section applies only to the following cities and towns that are members of the North Carolina Eastern Municipal Power Agency: Apex, Ayden, Belhaven, Benson, Clayton, Edenton, Elizabeth City, Farmville, Fremont, Greenville, Hamilton, Hertford, Hobgood, Hookerton, Kinston, LaGrange, Laurinburg, Louisburg, Lumberton, New Bern, Pikeville, Red Springs, Robersonville, Rocky Mount, Scotland Neck, Selma, Smithfield, Southport, Tarboro, Wake Forest, Washington, and Wilson.

History.

2011-129, ss. 1, 2; 2012-181, ss. 1, 2.

Local Modification.

(As to subsection (b)) Town of Louisburg: 2021-103, s. 1 (applicable to the use of revenue derived from rates for electric service to pay costs identified in G.S. 159B-39(b)(9), as enacted by s 1 of that act, on or after August 12, 2021, and expiring July 1, 2031).

§§ 159B-40,
159B-41.

Reserved for future codification purposes.